Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0163.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. Subject to part 2, the following amounts are appropriated for capital outlay projects from the following sources for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,400 Sec. 102. CAPITAL OUTLAY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,400 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,400 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 (2) COMMUNITY COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITY PLANNING AUTHORIZATIONS Ferris State University ? Allied Health Sciences Building ? for program and planning to be paid for from university resources (estimated total authorized cost $29,500,000; state share $22,125,000; university share $7,375,000) $ 100 Michigan State University ? Engineering and Digital Innovation Building ? for program and planning to be paid for from university resources (estimated total authorized cost $340,000,000; state share $30,000,000; university share $310,000,000) 100 Michigan Technological University ? Center for Convergence and Innovation ? for program and planning to be paid for from university resources (estimated total authorized cost $56,000,000; state share $30,000,000; university share $26,000,000) 100 University of Michigan - Dearborn ? Computer and Information Science Building renovation ? for program and planning to be paid for from university resources (estimated total authorized cost $40,000,000; state share $30,000,000; university share $10,000,000) 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Western Michigan University ? IF1 Knauss Hall renovation and addition ? for program and planning to be paid for from university resources (estimated total authorized cost $39,000,000; state share $29,250,000; university share $9,750,000) 100 Jackson College ? STEM remodel of James McDivitt Hall ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $45,000,000; state share $22,500,000; college share $22,500,000) 100 Kellogg Community College ? Roll Health Administration Building renovation ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $14,000,000; state share $7,000,000; college share $7,000,000) 100 Lansing Community College ? Energy and Utility Training Center ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $8,500,000; state share $4,250,000; college share $4,250,000) 100 North Central Michigan College ? Skilled Trades Education Pathways (STEP) Center ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $7,500,000; state share $3,500,000; college share $4,000,000) 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Oakland Community College ? Skilled Trades and Industrial Technology Building ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $127,000,000; state share $27,000,000; college share $100,000,000) 100 Washtenaw Community College ? Center for Success and Innovation ? for program and planning to be paid for from college resources (estimated total authorized cost $19,180,000; state share $9,590,000; college share $9,590,000) 100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,100 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,100 (3) STATE BUILDING AUTHORITY FINANCED CONSTRUCTION AUTHORIZATIONS Eastern Michigan University ? Engineering and Technology Complex ? phase II ? Roosevelt Hall (total authorized cost $42,500,000; state building authority share $29,999,800; university share $12,500,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) $ 100 Grand Valley State University ? Blue Dot Lab (total authorized cost $140,000,000; state building authority share $29,999,800; university share $110,000,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Northern Michigan University ? Northern Enterprise Center (college of business) (total authorized cost $19,900,000; state building authority share $13,369,800.00; university share $6,530,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Oakland University ? Science Complex Renovation Project (total authorized cost $40,000,000; state building authority share $29,999,800; university share $10,000,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Saginaw Valley State University ? Lake Huron Environmental Sciences Research Station (total authorized cost $10,000,000; state building authority share $7,499,800; university share $2,500,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 University of Michigan ? Flint ? Innovation and Technology Complex (total authorized cost $40,000,000; state building authority share $29,999,800; university share $10,000,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Wayne State University ? Wayne Law Classroom Building (total authorized cost $40,000,000; state building authority share $29,999,800; university share $10,000,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 Bay de Noc Community College ? Manufacturing Hub and Safety Training Center (total authorized cost $1,875,000; state building authority share $937,300; college share $937,500; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Kalamazoo Valley Community College ? Advanced Technical Wing renovation and expansion (total authorized cost $39,000,000; state building authority share $19,499,800; college share $19,500,000; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Macomb Community College ? Mobility and Sustainability Education Center (total authorized cost $59,980,000; state building authority share $26,349,100; college share $33,630,700; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Monroe County Community College ? Renovation and Addition to Welch Health Education Building (HEB) (total authorized cost $21,864,400; state building authority share $10,932,000; college share $10,932,200; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Wayne County Community College District ? Center for Virtual Learning and Digital Careers (total authorized cost $11,564,200; state building authority share $5,781,900; college share $5,782,100; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 Michigan State Capitol Commission ? Park Michigan (total authorized cost $25,000,000; state building authority share $24,999,800; state general fund/general purpose share $200) 100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,300 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 1,300 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 is $2,400.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $1,100.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1, are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. For the state building authority financed construction authorizations in part 1, the legislature determines 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 that the leases of the facilities from the authority are for a public purpose as authorized by 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.411 to 830.425. The legislature approves and authorizes the leases and conveyances of the property to the state building authority, the state building authority acquiring the facilities and leasing them to the state and the educational institutions, or state, as applicable, and the governor and secretary of state executing the leases for and on behalf of the state pursuant to the requirements of 1964 PA 183, MCL 830.411 to 830.425. Per the requirements of the leases, it is the intent of the legislature to annually appropriate sufficient amounts to pay the rent as obligated pursuant to the leases. Sec. 204. The cost to construct the Michigan Technological University ? H-STEM Engineering and Health Technology Complex ? Phase I project, initially authorized for construction in 2020 PA 257, is decreased by $1,514,800.00 to a new total project cost of $51,585,200.00 (total state building authority share $29,699,800.00; Michigan Technological University share $21,885,200.00; state general fund/general purpose share $200.00).